Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-182
Vehicle identification inspections; sheriff; designate inspectors.

The sheriff shall designate a sufficient number of persons to become certified to assure completion of inspections with reasonable promptness.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 82.